Mississippi, session 2026, HB61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of Coahoma Community College and the Board of Trustees of Mississippi Delta Community College for the purpose of providing funding for the repair, restoration, improvements and maintenance of campus facilities at those community colleges, as provided in Section 2 of this act, for the period beginning upon the passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027...... $100,000,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be allocated in equal amounts of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) to each community college, which shall be used specifically for the following purposes: (a)  Renovation and restoration of historic buildings and campus structures; (b)  Upgrades to campus infrastructure, including electrical, plumbing and HVAC systems; (c)  Improvements to student housing facilities; (d)  Development of modern academic spaces and laboratories; (e)  Enhancement of campus safety and security systems; (f)  Environmental sustainability projects, including energy efficiency initiatives; and (g)  Any other campus repairs deemed essential to the improvement of educational facilities at the community colleges. SECTION 3.  As a condition of receiving the funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act: (a)  Each community college shall be responsible for developing a comprehensive plan detailing the use of the community college's allocated funds, which plan must include, at a minimum, specific timelines for the repair and restoration work; and (b)  Each community college shall provide an annual report to the Legislature outlining the progress made on repairs and restorations funded by Section 1 of this act, including detailed accounting of expenditures and any project delays or challenges. SECTION 4.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.